ko: 모양: 화살; 코니컬; 커스텀; 원통형; 다이아몬드; 꽃; 자유 형식; 하트; 칠각형; 육방정계; 신장 모양; 팔각형의; 타원형; 오각형; 직사각형; 라운드; 반원형; 스퀘어; 별; 사다리꼴; 삼각형; 기타
pl: Kształt: Arrow; Stożkowaty; Niestandardowe terminy; Cylindryczne; Diament; Kwiat; Dowolny kształt; Serce; Heptagonalny; Sześciokątna; Kształt nerki; Ośmiokątny; Owalny; Pięciokąt; Prostokątna; Runda; Półkolisty; Kwadrat; Gwiazda; Trapez; Trójkątny; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Forma: Rodyklė; Kūgis; Pasirinktinis; Cilindras; Deimantas; Gėlė; Laisva forma; Širdelių forma; Septynkampis; Šešiakampis; Pupelės formos; Aštuonkampis; Ovalas; Penkiakampis; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Pusapvalis; Kvadratas; Žvaigždė; Trapecija; Trikampis; Kita
ru: Форма: Стрелка; Конический; Индивидуальный; Цилиндрический; Ромб; Цветы; Свободной формы; Сердце; Семиугольный; Шестиугольный; Почковидный; Восьмиугольный; Овал; Пятиугольный; Прямоугольник; Круг; Полукруг; Квадрат; Звезда; Трапециевидный; Треугольный; Другой
ro-RO: Formă: Săgeată; Conică; Personalizată; Cilindrică; Romboidală; Floare; Formă liberă; Inimă; Heptagonală; Hexagonală; În formă de rinichi; Octogonală; Ovală; Pentagonală; Dreptunghiulară; Zale rotunde; Semicirculară; Pătrat; Stea; Trapezoidală; Triunghiulară; Altele
zh-TW: 形狀: 箭形; 圓錐型; 客製化; 圓柱形; 鑽石; 花卉; 自由形; 心; 七邊形; 六角形; 腎形; 八角形; 橢圓形; 五角形; 長方形; 圓頭; 半圓形; 方頭; 星星; 梯形; 三角形; 其他
el: Σχήμα: Βέλος; Κωνικός; Custom; Κυλινδρικό; Διαμάντι; Λουλούδι; Ελεύθερη μορφή; Καρδιά; Επτάγωνος; Εξαγώνιος; Kidney-shaped; Οκταγωνικός; Οβάλ; Πεντάγωνος; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Ημικυκλικό; Τετράγωνο; Αστέρι; Τραπεζοειδής; Τριγωνική; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tvar: Šípka; Kónický; Prispôsobený; Valcový; Diamantový; Kvetinový; Voľná forma; Srdcový; Sedemuholníkový; Šesťhranný; V tvare obličky; Osemhranný; Oválny; Päťuholníkový; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Polkruhový; Hranatý; Hviezda; Trapézový; Trojuholníkový; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik: Strelica; Konusni; Prilagođeno; Cilindrični; Dijamant; Cvijet; Neodređenog oblika; Srce; Sedmerokutni; Šesterokutni; Bubrežasti; Osmerokutni; Ovalni; Peterokutni; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Polukružni; Kvadratni; Zvijezda; Trapezoidni; Trokutasti; Ostalo
de: Form: Pfeil; Konisch; Maßgeschneidert; Zylindrisch; Diamant; Blume; Freiform; Herz; Siebeneckig; Sechseckig; Nierenförmig; Achteckig; Oval; Fünfeckig; Rechteckig; Rund; Halbkreisförmig; Quadrat; Stern; Trapezförmig; Dreieckig; Sonstiges
ja: 形状: 矢印; 円錐形; カスタム; 円筒形; ダイヤモンド; フラワー; 自由形状; ハート; 七角形; 六角; 腎臓の形; 八角形; 楕円形; 五角形; 長方形; ラウンド; 半円形; スクエア; 星; 台形; 三角形; その他
sl-SI: Oblika: Puščica; Stožec; Po meri; Cilindrična; Diamant; Cvet; Prosta oblika; Srce; Heptagonalna; Šestkoten; Ledvičasta; Osemkotna; Ovalno; Peterokotna; Pravokotno; Okrogla; Polkrožna; Kvadratna; Zvezda; Trapezoidna; Trikotna; Drugo
fi: Muoto: Nuoli; Kartiomainen; Mukautettu; Lieriömäinen; Timantti; Kukka; Vapaa muoto; Sydän; Seitsenkulmainen; Kuusikulmainen; Munuaisen muotoinen; Kahdeksankulmainen; Soikea; Viisikulmainen; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Puolipyöreä; Neliömäinen; Tähti; Puolisuunnikas; Kolmion muotoinen; Muu
nb: Form: Pil; Konisk; Tilpasset; Sylindrisk; Diamant; Blomst; Friform; Hjerte; Heptagonal; Heksagonal; Nyreformet; Oktagonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Rektangulær; Rund; Halvsirkel; Firkantet; Stjerne; Trapes; Trekantet; Annen
da: Form: Pil; Konisk; Skræddersyet; Cylindrisk; Diamant; Blomster; Fri form; Hjerte; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; Nyreformet; Ottekantet; Oval; Femkantet; Rektangulær; Rund; Halvcirkelformet; Firkant; Stjerne; Trapezformet; Trekantet; Andet
fr: Forme: Flèche; Conique; Personnalisé; Cylindrique; Diamant; Fleur; Forme libre; Cœur; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; En forme de rein; Octogonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Rectangulaire; Rond; Semi-circulaire; Carré; Étoile; Trapézoïdal; Triangulaire; Autre
cs: Tvar: Šipka; Kónický; Vlastní; Válcový; Diamant; Květina; Volný tvar; Srdce; Sedmiúhelník; Šestiúhelník; Ledvinovitý tvar; Osmiúhelníkový; Oválný; Pětiúhelníkový; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Polokruhový; Čtvercová; Hvězda; Lichoběžníkový; Trojúhelníkový; Jiné
tr: Şekil: Ok; Konik; Özel; Silindirik; Elmas; Çiçek; Serbest form; Kalp; Yedigen; Altıgen şeklinde; Böbrek şekilli; Sekizgen şeklinde; Oval; Beşgen; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Yarım daire; Kare; Yıldız; Yamuk; Üçgen şekilli; Diğer
pt-PT: Forma: Seta; Cónico; À medida; Cilíndrico; Diamante; Flor; Forma livre; Coração; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; Em forma de rim; Octogonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Retangular; Redondo; Semicircular; Quadrado; Estrela; Trapezoidal; Triangular; Outro
es: Forma: Flecha; Cónico; Personalizado; Cilíndrico; Diamante; Flor; Forma libre; Corazón; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; En forma de riñón; Octagonal; Ovalado; Pentagonal; Rectangular; Redondo; Semicircular; Cuadrado; Estrella; Trapezoidal; Triangular; Otros
it: Forma: Freccia; Conico; Personalizzato; Cilindrico; Diamante; Fiori; Forma irregolare; Cuore; Eptagonale; Esagonale; A forma di rene; Ottagonale; Ovale; Pentagonale; Rettangolare; Rotonda; Semicircolare; Quadrata; Stella; Trapezoidale; Triangolare; Altro
vi: Hình dạng: Mũi tên; Hình nón; Tùy chỉnh; Hình trụ; Kim cương; Hoa; Hình thức tự do; Trái tim; Hình bảy cạnh; Lục phương; Hình thận; Bát giác; Hình trái xoan; Hình ngũ giác; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Hình bán nguyệt; Mũi giày vuông; Ngôi sao; Thang; Tam giác; Khác
nl: Vorm: Pijl; Conisch; Aangepast; Cilindrisch; Diamant; Bloem; Vrije vorm; Hart; Zevenhoekig; Zeshoekig; Niervormig; Achthoekig; Ovaal; Vijfhoekig; Rechthoekig; Rond; Halfrond; Vierkant; Ster; Trapeziumvormig; Driehoekig; Andere
th: รูปร่าง: ลูกศร; ทรงกรวย; ปรับเข้ารูป; ทรงกระบอก; เพชร; ดอกไม้; รูปทรงอิสระ; หัวใจ; เจ็ดเหลี่ยม; แบบหกเหลี่ยม; รูปไต; แบบแปดเหลี่ยม; รูปไข่; แบบห้าเหลี่ยม; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ครึ่งวงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ดาว; สี่เหลี่ยมคางหมู; แนวสามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Форма: Стрела; Конична; Персонализирана; Цилиндрична; Диамант; Цвете; Свободна форма; Сърце; Седмоъгълна; Шестоъгълна; Бъбрековидна; Осмоъгълна; Овална; Пентагонална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Полукръгла; Квадратна; Звезда; Трапецовидна; Триъгълна; Други
en: Shape: Arrow; Conical; Custom; Cylindrical; Diamond; Flower; Free-form; Heart; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; Kidney-shaped; Octagonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Rectangular; Round; Semicircular; Square; Star; Trapezoidal; Triangular; Other
zh-CN: 形状: 箭; 锥形; 定制; 圆柱形; 钻石; 花; 自由形式; 心; 七边形; 六角形; 肾形; 八角形; 椭圆形; 五角形; 矩形; 圆头; 半圆形; 方形; 星型; 梯形; 三角形; 其他
sv: Form: Pil; Konisk; Anpassad; Cylindriskt; Diamant; Blomma; Fri form; Hjärta; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; Njurformad; Oktagonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Rektangulär; Rund; Halvcirkelformig; Fyrkantig; Stjärna; Trapezoidal; Triangulär; Annat
hu: Alak: Nyíl; Kúp; Egyéni; Henger; Gyémánt; Virág; Szabad formájú; Szív; Hétszögletű; Hatszögletű; Vesealakú; Nyolcszögű; Ovális; Ötszögű; Téglalap; Kerek; Félkör; Négyzet; Csillag; Trapézalakú; Háromszögletű; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma: Seta; Cônico; Personalizada; Cilíndrico; Diamante; Flor; Forma livre; Coração; Heptagonal; Hexagonal; Em forma de rim; Octogonal; Oval; Pentagonal; Retangular; Redondo; Semicircular; Quadrado; Estrela; Trapezoidal; Triangular; Outro